Florida, session 2026, SB50.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSubsections (4) and (8) of section 394.47891, 21 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 22 394.47891âVeterans treatment court programs.â 23 (4)âADMISSION.âA defendant who meets the eligibility 24 requirements provided in under subsection (8) may be admitted to 25 a veterans treatment court program at any stage of a criminal 26 proceeding. Entry into a veterans treatment court program must 27 be based upon the sentencing courtâs assessment of the 28 defendantâs criminal history, substance abuse screening outcome, 29 amenability to the services of the program, total sentence 30 points, the recommendation of the state attorney and the victim, 31 if any, and the defendantâs agreement to enter the program. A 32 defendant seeking to participate in a veterans treatment court 33 program must submit an application to the state attorney. The 34 state attorney must review each application and determine 35 whether the defendant meets the eligibility requirements in 36 subsection (8). 37 (8)âELIGIBILITY.â 38 (a)âA defendant may participate in a veterans treatment 39 court program if he or she is approved by the multidisciplinary 40 team state attorney, in consultation with the court, and meets 41 the following criteria: 42 1.âThe defendant has a service-related mental health 43 condition, service-related traumatic brain injury, service 44 related substance use disorder, or service-related psychological 45 problem or has experienced military sexual trauma. 46 2.âThe defendantâs participation in the veterans treatment 47 court program is in the interest of justice and of benefit to 48 the defendant and the community. 49 (b)âIn making the determination under subparagraph (a)2., 50 the multidisciplinary team the state attorney, in consultation 51 with the court, must consider: 52 1.âThe nature and circumstances of the offense charged. 53 2.âThe special characteristics or circumstances of the 54 defendant and any victim or alleged victim, including any 55 recommendation of the victim or alleged victim. 56 3.âThe defendantâs criminal history and whether the 57 defendant previously participated in a veterans treatment court 58 program or similar program. 59 4.âWhether the defendantâs needs exceed the treatment 60 resources available to the veterans treatment court program. 61 5.âThe impact on the community of the defendantâs 62 participation and treatment in the veterans treatment court 63 program. 64 6.âRecommendations of any law enforcement agency involved 65 in investigating or arresting the defendant. 66 7.âIf the defendant owes restitution, the likelihood of 67 payment during the defendantâs participation in the veterans 68 treatment court program. 69 8.âAny mitigating circumstances. 70 9.âAny other circumstances reasonably related to the 71 defendantâs case. 72 Section 2.âSubsection (9) is added to section 948.01, 73 Florida Statutes, to read: 74 948.01âWhen court may place defendant on probation or into 75 community control.â 76 (9)(a)âNotwithstanding s. 921.0024 and effective for 77 offenses committed on or after July 1, 2026, the sentencing 78 court may place the defendant into a postadjudicatory veterans 79 treatment court program if the offense is a nonviolent felony, 80 the defendant is a servicemember or veteran as those terms are 81 defined in s. 394.47891(2), and the defendant is otherwise 82 qualified to participate in a veterans treatment court program 83 under s. 394.47891(8). Satisfactory completion of the program 84 must be a condition of the defendantâs probation or community 85 control. As used in this subsection, the term ânonviolent 86 felonyâ means a third degree felony violation under chapter 810 87 or any other felony offense that is not a forcible felony as 88 defined in s. 776.08. 89 (b)âThe defendant must be fully advised of the purpose of 90 the veterans treatment court program, and the defendant must 91 agree to enter the program. The original sentencing court shall 92 relinquish jurisdiction of the defendantâs case to the 93 postadjudicatory veterans treatment court program until the 94 defendant is no longer active in the program, the case is 95 returned to the sentencing court due to the defendantâs 96 termination from the program for failure to comply with the 97 terms of the program, or the defendantâs sentence is completed. 98 (c)âA defendant sentenced to a postadjudicatory veterans 99 treatment court program who, while a veterans treatment court 100 program participant, is the subject of a violation of probation 101 or community control under s. 948.06 shall have the violation of 102 probation or community control heard by the judge presiding over 103 the postadjudicatory veterans treatment court program. The judge 104 shall dispose of any such violation, after a hearing on or 105 admission of the violation, as he or she deems appropriate if 106 the resulting sentence or conditions are lawful. 107 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.